src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_AIBBYD !!= * @CODE@ aibbâd:aibb
!!! inflection_type="1"
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[221] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: aibbâd
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
! (5)  Imprt.Sg2: aaib
! (6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
! (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
! (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: äibbaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !! (1)  Inf: aibbâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: äibb
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: äiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: aiʹbbe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: aaibâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ääibas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: aibbu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^XYY2XY FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: aib»


LEXICON V_TOBDDYD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}bdd
: V0_TOBDDYD ;
LEXICON IV_TOBDDYD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}bdd
+IV: V0_TOBDDYD ;
LEXICON TV_TOBDDYD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}bdd
+TV: V0_TOBDDYD ;
LEXICON V0_TOBDDYD !!= * @CODE@ tobddâd:to%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}bdd
!!! inflection_type="1"
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[221] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: tobddâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: tåbdd
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: tåʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: toʹbdde
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: toobdâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: tååbdas
+Err/Orth:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY CONDITIONAL ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: tobddu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^XYY2XY FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: tobd»


LEXICON V_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õhtt
: V0_OHTTYD ;
LEXICON IV_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õhtt
+IV: V0_OHTTYD ;
!LEXICON TV_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õhtt
!+TV: V0_OHTTYD ;
LEXICON V0_OHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ õhttâd:õ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}h%{ʹØ%}tt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! FORMS
! * Yaml: 
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: õhttâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2,9)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: âhtt
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: âʹhtte
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: õʹhtte
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^V2VV%^XYY2VY VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Pot.Sg3: õõutâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2VY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Imprt.Sg3: ââutas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: õhttu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^XYY2VY FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: õut»


LEXICON V_KUOSKKYD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
: V0_KUOSKKYD ;
LEXICON IV_KUOSKKYD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
+IV: V0_KUOSKKYD ;
!LEXICON TV_KUOSKKYD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
!+TV: V0_KUOSKKYD ;
LEXICON V0_KUOSKKYD !!= * @CODE@ kuõskkâd:kuõskk
!!! inflection_type="1"
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[332].2 (Diphthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
! Strong consonant cluster
! Diphthong
! THIS NEEDS MORE DEVELOPING
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: kuõskkâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: kuâskk
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PALE%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kueʹsǩǩe (allophonic)
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kuõʹsǩǩe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: kuõskâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: kuâskas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kuõskku
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kuâskkaz
!! Imprt+Pl3


:%^XYY2XY FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: kuõsk»


LEXICON V_CHIOHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ čiõhttâd:čiõhtt
: V0_CHIOHTTYD ;
LEXICON IV_CHIOHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ čiõhttâd:čiõhtt
+IV: V0_CHIOHTTYD ;
!LEXICON TV_CHIOHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ čiõhttâd:čiõhtt
!+TV: V0_CHIOHTTYD ;
LEXICON V0_CHIOHTTYD !!= * @CODE@ čiõhttâd:čiõhtt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: 354)
! 1.1 Inf in âd (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.1.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Not Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3, Pot.Sg3
! 1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.1.1[1].1.1[332].2 (Diphthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!   Strong grade: Inf, Ind.Prs.Sg3
!   Strong grade: Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3
!   Weak grade: Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3, Imprt.Sg3
! FORMS
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
! Strong consonant cluster
! Diphthong
! THIS NEEDS MORE DEVELOPING
: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: čiõhttâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: čeâhtt
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kueʹsǩǩe (allophonic)
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kuõʹsǩǩe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^XYY2VY VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: čuõutâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^XYY2VY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: čeâutas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: čiõhttu
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: čeâhttaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

:%^XYY2VY FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: čiõut»


LEXICON V_SKHIYNHKKYD !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkkâd:sǩiâŋkk
: V0_SKHIYNHKKYD ;
!LEXICON IV_SKHIYNHKKYD !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkkâd:sǩiâŋkk
!+IV: V0_SKHIYNHKKYD ;
!LEXICON TV_SKHIYNHKKYD !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkkâd:sǩiâŋkk
!+TV: V0_SKHIYNHKKYD ;
LEXICON V0_SKHIYNHKKYD !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkkâd:sǩiâŋkk
!!! inflection_type="1"
! gradation: extra::strong::weak
! weak geminate
! Lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' is for verbs like
! * Yaml: __V-skjiankk__

: VSUF-INF_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (1)  Inf: sǩiâŋkkâd
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2,
!! Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc
!!  Ind.Prt.ConNeg, Imprt+Pl3, PrfPrc
!! NomAct in MOsh

:%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: sǩeäŋkk
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Imprt+Pl3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: sǩeäʹŋǩǩe
!! +Ind+Prs+Pl3

:%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: sǩieʹŋǩǩe
!! +Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

:%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (5-6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: sǩiâŋkâž
!! +Ind+Prs+Sg1, +Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+Sg4
!! Imprt+Sg2, Imprt+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, Cond, +Der+Der/Caus

+Imprt+Sg3:%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>as K ; !!= * @CODE@ (7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: sǩeäŋkas
!! Imprt+Sg3

: VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: sǩiâŋkku
!! Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

:%^VOWLower%>az K ; !!= * @CODE@ (9)  Ind.Imprt.Pl3: sǩeäŋkkaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

:%^XYY2XY FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) Allegro for incoative: sǩiâŋk»



LEXICON V_VUOIDDYD !!= * @CODE@ čuõiggâd:čuõigg
: V0_VUOIDDYD ;
